Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2809
Tort, defined.

Tort shall mean any legal wrong, breach of duty, or negligent or unlawful act or omission proximately causing injury or damage to another.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 9.